Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-604.02
Division of Public Health of Department of Health and Human Services; survey and certification agency for medicare program and federal clinical laboratory requirements.

For the purpose of assisting the citizens of the state in receiving benefits under the federal medicare law, the State of Nebraska authorizes the Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services to act as the survey and certification agency for the medicare program in Nebraska and to contract to perform such functions with the federal agency responsible for administration of the medicare program and to enter into such other agreements as may be necessary to implement federal requirements. The division may also contract with the federal agency to perform survey and certification functions in accordance with the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988.

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 14;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 158;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 844;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 733.